Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20178-1123
Act, how cited.

Sections 8-1101 to 8-1123 shall be known and may be cited as the Securities Act of Nebraska.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 23, p. 1797;

Laws 1997, LB 335, § 11;

Laws 1998, LB 1180, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 11;

Laws 2009, LB113, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB148, § 20.